hunspell/qu/qu.aff
# VERBS COMMON CONJUGATIONS common second level
#SFX flag strip add match
SFX c Y 52                 #Verbs: conjugations and the like
SFX c na na//+ na          # Infinitive singulars
SFX c na ni//+ na          # Present 1st person singular
SFX c na nki//+ na         # Present 2nd person singular | Future 2nd person singular/plural
SFX c na n//+ na           # Present 3rd person singular
SFX c na nchik//+ na       # Present 1st person plural
SFX c na nkichik//+ na     # Present 2nd person plural
SFX c na nkuna//+ na       # Present 3nd person plural
SFX c na sha//+ na         # Future 1st person singular
SFX c na nka//+ na         # Future 3rd person singular/plural
SFX c na shun//+ na        # Future / Imperative 1st person plural
SFX c na shunchik//+ na    # Future 1st person plural ("all of us")
SFX c na rkani//+ na       # Past 1st person singular
SFX c na rkanki//+ na      # Past 2nd person singular
SFX c na rka//+ na         # Past 3rd person singular
SFX c na rkanchik//+ na    # Past 1st person plural
SFX c na rkankichik//+ na  # Past 2nd person plural
SFX c na rkakuna//+ na     # Past 3nd person plural
SFX c na nkapak//+ na      # for/to ~
SFX c na shpaka//+ na      # Contitional same person
SFX c na kpika//+ na       # Contitional other person
SFX c na rkakpi//+ na      # Conditional Past 3rd person singular
SFX c na k//+ na           # Personification
SFX c na y//+ [^i]na       # Imperative 1st person singular not ending in "I" / Nounification
SFX c ina i//+ ina         # Imperative 1st person singular ending in "I"/ Nounification 
SFX c na yuk//+ na         # The person having nounified ~ 
SFX c na nayay//+ na       # Cuausing ~ 
SFX c na yari// na         # More Imperative 1st person singular
SFX c na chun//+ na        # Imperative 3rd person singular / Present subjunctive
SFX c na ychik//+ [^i]na   # Imperative 2nd person plural not ending in "I"
SFX c ina ichik//+ ina     # Imperative 2nd person plural ending in "I"
SFX c na chunkuna//+ na    # Imperative 3rd person plural
SFX c na shkani//+ na      # Perfect 1st person singular
SFX c na shkanki//+ na     # Perfect 2nd person singular
SFX c na shka//+ na        # Perfect 3rd person singular
SFX c na shkanchik//+ na   # Perfect 1st person plural
SFX c na shkankichik//+ na # Perfect 2nd person plural
SFX c na shkakuna//+ na    # Perfect 3rd person plural
SFX c na shkarka//+ na     # Plusperfect [persons?]
SFX c na shpa//+ na        # Gerund same person.
SFX c na shkanka//+ na     # Was going to ~
SFX c na panki//+ na       # POLITE Present 2nd person singular | Future 2nd person singular/plural
SFX c na panchik//+ na     # POLITE Present 1st person plural
SFX c na pankichik//+ na   # POLITE Present 2nd person plural
SFX c na parkani//+ na     # POLITE Past 1rd person singular
SFX c na parkanchik//+ na  # POLITE Past 2rd person plural
SFX c na parka//+ na       # POLITE Past 3rd person singular
SFX c na pashun//+ na      # POLITE Future 1st person plural
SFX c na pay//+ na         # POLITE Imperative 1st person singular not ending in "I" / Nounification
SFX c na payari// na       # POLITE More Imperative 1st person singular
SFX c na pachun//+ na      # POLITE Imperative 3rd person singular / Present subjunctive
SFX c na paychik//+ na     # POLITE Imperative 2nd person plural
SFX c na pachunkuna//+ na  # POLITE Imperative 3rd person plural

# VERBS COMMON CONJUGATIONS pluralized first level
# (copy the compatible variants from /v above)
#SFX flag strip add match

## the double ## below means version 2: not yuya|nariku|na but yuya|RINAKU|na
# could be this is correct for other verbs...

SFX w Y 25
SFX w na na//+p na            # plural stem/Infinitive
SFX w na rina//+p na          # plural reflexive
SFX w na rimuna//+p na        # plural reflexive "arriving ~ing"
SFX w na richina//+p na       # plural reflexive "make ~"
SFX w na rikrina//+p na       # plural reflexive "going to ~"
SFX w na rinakuna//+p na      ## plural reflexive "constantly ~"
SFX w na krina//+p na         # plural "going to ~"
SFX w na rana//+p na          # plural "always ~"
SFX w na riyana//+p na        # plural "always ~"
SFX w na kuna//+p na          # plural "constantly ~"
SFX w na kumuna//+p na        # plural "constantly arriving doing ~"
SFX w na kumurina//+p na      # plural "constantly arriving doing ~ reflexiwe"
SFX w na kuchina//+p na       # plural "constantly make ~"
SFX w na kukrina//+p na       # plural "constantly going to ~"
SFX w na muna//+p na          # plural "arriving ~ing"
SFX w na muwana//+p na        # plural "arriving ~ing in my fawor"
SFX w na mukrina//+p na       # plural "going to arrive ~ing" 
SFX w na mukuna//+p na        # plural "constantly arriving ~ing"
SFX w na wana//+p na          # plural "doing ~ in my favor"
SFX w na china//+p na         # plural "make ~"
SFX w na chiwana//+p na       # plural "make ~ in my favor"
SFX w na chirina//+p na       # plural "make ~ for oneself"
SFX w na chikuna//+p na       # plural "constantly making ~"
SFX w na chikrina//+p na      # plural "going to make ~"
SFX w na chimuna//+p na       # plural "arriving making ~"


# VERBS COMMON CONJUGATIONS pluralized second level
SFX p Y 41                 #Verbs: conjugations and the like
SFX p na na//+ na          # Pluralized infinitive
SFX p na nki//+ na         # Present 2nd person singular | Future 2nd person singular/plural plur
SFX p na n//+ na           # Present 3rd person singular plur
SFX p na nchik//+ na       # Present 1st person plural plur
SFX p na nkichik//+ na     # Present 2nd person plural plur
SFX p na nkuna//+ na       # Present 3nd person plural plur
SFX p na nka//+ na         # Future 3rd person singular/plural plur
SFX p na shun//+ na        # Future / Imperative 1st person plural plur
SFX p na shunchik//+ na    # Future 1st person plural ("all of us") plur
SFX p na rkanki//+ na      # Past 2nd person singular plur
SFX p na rka//+ na         # Past 3rd person singular plur
SFX p na rkanchik//+ na    # Past 1st person plural plur
SFX p na rkankichik//+ na  # Past 2nd person plural plur
SFX p na rkakuna//+ na     # Past 3nd person plural plur
SFX p na nkapak//+ na      # for/to plur
SFX p na shpaka//+ na      # Contitional same person plur
SFX p na kpika//+ na       # Contitional other person plur
SFX p na rkakpi//+ na      # Conditional Past 3rd person singular plur
SFX p na yuk//+ na         # The person having nounified ~ plur
SFX p na nayay//+ na       # Cuausing ~ plur
SFX p na chun//+ na        # Imperative 3rd person singular / Present subjunctive plur
SFX p na ychik//+ na       # Imperative 2nd person plural plur not ending in "I"
SFX p ina ichik//+ ina     # Imperative 2nd person plural plur ending in "I"
SFX p na chunkuna//+ na    # Imperative 3rd person plural plur
SFX p na y//+ [^i]na       # Nounification "amongst us"
SFX p ina i//+ ina         # Nounification "amongst us"
SFX p na shkani//+ na      # Perfect 1st person singular plur
SFX p na shkanki//+ na     # Perfect 2nd person singular plur
SFX p na shka//+ na        # Perfect 3rd person singular plur
SFX p na shkanchik//+ na   # Perfect 1st person plural plur
SFX p na shkankichik//+ na # Perfect 2nd person plural plur
SFX p na shkakuna//+ na    # Perfect 3rd person plural plur
SFX p na shkarka//+ na     # Plusperfect [persons?] plur
SFX p na shpa//+ na        # Gerund same person. plur
SFX p na shkanka//+ na     # Was going to ~ plur
SFX p na panchik//+ na     # POLITE Present 1st person plural plur
SFX p na pankichik//+ na   # POLITE Present 2nd person plural plur
SFX p na pashun//+ na      # POLITE Future 1st person plural plur
SFX p na pachun//+ na      # POLITE Imperative 3rd person singular / Present subjunctive plur
SFX p na paychik//+ na     # POLITE Imperative 2nd person plural plur
SFX p na pachunkuna//+ na  # POLITE Imperative 3rd person plural plur
