hunspell/qu/qu.dic
achikyana//vw
acusana//vw
advertina//vw
akapana//vw
aklluna//vw
akuna//vw
allana//vw
allawkayana//vw
allishunkunayana//vw
alliyachina//vw
alzana//vw
amintanayana//vw
amkasnayana//vw
amsanayana//vw
amuknayana//vw
amullina//vw
anchuchina//vw
anchurina//vw
ankasnayana//vw
ankuyana//vw
apana//vw
apoyana//vw
armana//vw
ashanayana//vw
ashnaknayana//vw
ashnana//vw
asina//vw
aspina//vw
awana//vw
aysana//vw
ayunpakuna//vw
bendiciyana//vw
brujuna//vw
cambiana//vw
cargana//vw
castigana//vw
chakatana//vw
chakmana//vw
chakruna//vw
challchunayana//vw
challinayana//vw
chamuknayana//vw
chanina//vw
chapuna//vw
charikyana//vw
charkina//vw
charkiyana//vw
chaskina//vw
chawana//vw
chawannayana//vw
chawayana//vw
chawchayana//vw
chawpinayana//vw
chawpiyana//vw
chayana//vw
chichunayana//vw
chikannayana//vw
chiknina//vw
chillpina//vw
chillpiyana//vw
chimpapuna//vw
chinina//vw
chinkana//vw
chirapana//vw
chiriyana//vw
chuchuna//vw
chukchuna//vw
chullanayana//vw
chullunayana//vw
chulunnayana//vw
chumpillina//vw
chunkanayana//vw
chununayana//vw
chupina//vw
churuna//vw
chushakyana//vw
chuskuyana//vw
chusuyana//vw
chuyakuna//vw
chuyayana//vw
contestana//vw
cuidana////vw
dedicana//vw
discretonayana//vw
divorciana//vw
encinayana//vw
esforzana//vw
fielnayana//vw
gratisnayana//vw
hillunayana//vw
humildenayana//vw
ikina//vw
ikiyana//vw
illakyana//vw
importana//vw
intindina//vw
invitana//vw
irkinayana//vw
ishkaynayana//vw
ishkuna//vw
iskunnayana//vw
ismuna//vw
ismuyana//vw
jakannayana//vw
jakuna//vw
jamuknayana//vw
jamukyana//vw
jananiknayana//vw
japichina//vw
jarkana//vw
jatarina//vw
jatunyachina//vw
jatunyana//vw
jawayana//vw
jayaknayana//vw
jaytana//vw
jichuna//vw
juchachina//vw
juillunayana//vw
jukipuna//vw
jukunayana//vw
jumpina//vw
juramentuna//vw
jutkuna//vw
kachana//vw
kachiyachina//vw
kalimana//vw
kallpana//vw
kamarina//vw
kamina//vw
kanchisnayana//vw
kanina//vw
kapaknayana//vw
kaparina//vw
karana//vw
kariyana//vw
karkayana//vw
karuyana//vw
kashtuna//vw
kasiyana//vw
kaspiyana//vw
katana//vw
katuna//vw
kaupuna//vw
kawina//vw
kawsana//vw
kayana//vw
kichkiyana//vw
kichurina//vw
kikinyana//vw
killanayana//vw
killkana//vw
killunayana//vw
kimina//vw
kimsanayana//vw
kinchana//vw
kinkuna//vw
kipayana//vw
kishpirina//vw
kitayana//vw
krina//vw
kuchunayana//vw
kullunayana//vw
kulunnayana//vw
kumuna//vw
kunana//vw
kunkana//vw
kunuknayana//vw
kununa//vw
kurkuyana//vw
kusana//vw
kushichina//r>+-,wv
kushinayana//vw
kushnichina//vw
kushparina//vw
kutana//vw
kutimuna//vw
kutsinayana//vw
kutuna//vw
kutuyana//vw
kuyana//vw
kuyuchina//vw
kuyurina//vw
lanchana//vw
llakina//vw
llakllana//vw
llampunayana//vw
llankana//vw
llatana//vw
llikina//vw
llimpikyana//vw
lliwina//vw
lluchuna//vw
llukchina//vw
llullaknayana//vw
llullana//vw
llulluyana//vw
llupina//vw
lunyana//vw
mallina//vw
mancharina//vw
maskana//vw
mayayana//vw
mayornayana//vw
medina//vw
millaynayana//vw
minkachina//vw
mishana//vw
mitina//vw
miyuna//vw
mulana//vw
muruyana//vw
muspana//vw
mutkichina//vw
muyuyana//vw
ñañunayana//vw
nayana//vw
ñutuna//vw
obedecina//vw
pakana//vw
paktanayana//vw
pallana//vw
pantachina//vw
parana//vw
pasayana//vw
patarina//vw
piminayana//vw
piñayana//vw
pintana//vw
pitina//vw
puchuna//vw
pukllana//vw
puluna//vw
purayana//vw
pushana//vw
pusuyana//vw
puzukyana//vw
rasuna//vw
regana//vw
richana//vw
riksina//vw
rimana//vw
rukunayana//vw
rurana//vw
sakmana//vw
samana//vw
sankuyana//vw
saruna//vw
sawarina//vw
semana//vw
shayaknayana//vw
shaykuna//vw
shitana//vw
shutichina//r>+-,wv
shutuna//vw
shuyushkanayana//vw
sinchiyana//vw
sirana//vw
solonayana//vw
suchuyana//vw
sumaknayana//vw
takana//vw
tallina//vw
tanikyana//vw
tantarina//vw
tarpuna//vw
tikrachina//vw
tinkina//vw
trabajana//vw
tsalanayana//vw
tsankayana//vw
tsikllayana//vw
tsunkana//vw
tuktsana//vw
tulana//vw
tupana//vw
uhuna//vw
ukunayana//vw
unayana//vw
upana//vw
upyana//vw
urmana//vw
utkana//vw
viajana//vw
wakana//vw
wakchanayana//vw
wakllishkanayana//vw
wakuyana//vw
waminsiyana//vw
wañuchina//vw
washanyana//vw
wasichina//vw
wayayana//vw
waynayana//vw
wichina//vw
willana//vw
wiranayana//vw
wishturina//vw
yachana//vw
yalliyana//vw
yanayana//vw
yapana//vw
yaykuna//vw
yuyaknayana//vw
yuyayyana//vw
